Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Powers and Duties

154.12-050.
Contracting of functions and services.

The cabinet shall have the authority to contract for the provision of any economic development function or service with private firms or public institutions provided that such contracts meet the following conditions:

They are based on competitive requests for proposals;

They incorporate strict performance standards and accountability criteria;

They require periodic audit;

They are subject to regular rebidding; and

Where appropriate, they leverage other private and public funds.

Wherever feasible, the cabinet shall contract for the provision of functions and services rather than establishing new governmental structures.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 10, effective July 14, 1992.

154.12-100.
Economic development fund — Project selection criteria — Written commitment — Approval — Report.

Economic development fund means the fund authorized by the General Assembly for the purpose of promoting economic development within the state.

The economic development fund shall be funded through the issuance of bonds by the State Property and Buildings Commission or other appropriation by the General Assembly.

The economic development fund shall be administered by the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development. The authority shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A for project selection criteria and administration of the economic development fund. The project selection criteria shall include but not be limited to the following:

Potential job creation or job retention;

Degree of public or private and local involvement;

Degree and conditions of project payback; and

Amount of investment.

Prior to submission of an economic development fund project to the authority, the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development shall receive a written commitment from the public or private organization which has requested funds outlining projected job creation and retention, an investment breakdown, and overall project description. This shall be submitted by the secretary to the authority. Subsequently, the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development shall execute a written agreement with the public or private organizations involved expressing in detail the respective obligations on the parties.

Projects of state agencies as defined in KRS 42.005 shall not be eligible for funding from the economic development fund program, unless expressly provided in a branch budget bill. Airport construction and renovation projects shall be eligible for funding under this section. The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development shall consult with the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet on the terms and conditions relating to the use of funds pursuant to this section before any commitment is made on any project to any public or private organization.

Following the approval by the authority, the project shall be presented by the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development or his or her designee with supporting documentation for review and approval at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee pursuant to KRS 45.810 and at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the State Property and Buildings Commission pursuant to KRS 56.450.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 56.872(3), the amount of economic development funds issued during any biennium shall not exceed the balance of the fund, and any funds authorized in the biennial budget shall carry forward and shall not lapse.

By November 1 of each year, the Cabinet for Economic Development shall prepare and post an annual report to the cabinet’s Web site as required in KRS 154.12-2035, showing the economic development funds issued during the previous fiscal year, funds disbursed, the amounts paid back, and the balance still owing with respect to grants or loans made by the Cabinet for Economic Development with proceeds of economic development funds during the previous five (5) fiscal years.

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 29, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 387, § 26, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 16, effective July 15, 1996; 2014, ch. 134, § 4, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 199, § 10, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 172, § 1, effective March 26, 2019.